Idaho, session 2025, H0474.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 30, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3015, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3015. IMMIGRATION STATUS AND NATIONALITY OF ARRESTED INDIVIDU-
ALS. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administration of criminal justice" means performance of any of
the following activities: detection, apprehension, detention, pre-
trial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication, correc-
tional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal
offenders. The "administration of criminal justice" shall include
criminal identification activities and the collection, storage, and
dissemination of criminal history record information.
(b) "Arrest" means taking a person into custody in the manner autho-
rized by law by a peace officer or private citizen.
(c) "Immigration status" means a person's legal right to be in the
United States or lack thereof.
(d) "Law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement agency of the
state or any political subdivision of the state, including the Idaho
state police and any municipal police department or county sheriff's
department.
(2) In the performance of the administration of criminal justice, all
law enforcement agencies shall verify and record the immigration status and
nationality of any arrested individual.
(3) No later than October 1, 2025, each local, county, and state law en-
forcement agency shall record and publish a biannual report containing: the
immigration status and nationality of criminal offenders; crime statistics
related to foreign nationals arrested in Idaho, including the number of il-
legal aliens investigated, apprehended, detained, and transferred to fed-
eral officials; the crimes for which such persons were arrested, if any; and
any reason for noncompliance with the provisions of this section, if appli-
cable.
(4) Local, county, and state law enforcement agencies that fail to
comply with the provisions of this section may be subject to withholding of
state funding for their agency.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.